Missouri, session 2026, HB3138.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 85, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 85.705, to read as follows:
85.705. 1. Beginning January 1, 2027, a missing persons unit shall be established
within any police department located in a county with more than one million
inhabitants. The unit shall provide services deemed necessary to aid in the location of
missing persons including, but not limited to:
(1) Coordinating and investigating reports of missing persons;
(2) Collecting and disseminating information regarding missing persons in order
to assist in locating such persons, including entry of the missing person's information
into the Missouri Uniform Law Enforcement System (MULES) and the National Crime
Information Center (NCIC) system;
(3) Establishing a system for communication of information relating to persons
reported as missing; and
(4) Coordinating and communicating with the Missouri state highway patrol's
missing persons unit established under section 43.402.
2. Any police department located in a county with more than one million
inhabitants may hire additional officers and staff or may assign officers or staff
currently employed by the department to the missing persons unit. Compensation and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3138 2
benefits for such employees shall be paid from the police department's annual operating
budget.
✔